New York, session 2025-2026, A4204.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The general business law is amended by adding a new section 2 396-oo to read as follows: 3 § 396-oo. Digital coupons; availability of paper coupons. 1. For 4 purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the following 5 meanings: 6 (a) "digital coupon" means a store voucher, rebate or similar instru- 7 ment that is offered to a consumer online through a website, mobile 8 application, or other online platform; 9 (b) "retail mercantile establishment" shall have the same meaning as 10 section two hundred seventeen of this chapter; and 11 (c) "online retailer" shall have the same meaning as section two 12 hundred seventeen of this chapter. 13 2. Every retail mercantile establishment selling or offering for sale 14 goods or services that offers a digital coupon shall make available to a 15 consumer a paper coupon of identical value. 16 3. This section shall not apply to online retailers operating exclu- 17 sively through websites, mobile applications or other online platforms 18 or to retail mercantile establishments offering a particular good for 19 sale only through a website, mobile application or other online plat- 20 form. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06587-02-6 A. 4204--A 2 1 4. The secretary of state may adopt rules and regulations necessary to 2 effectuate the purposes of this section. 3 5. Any person that violates the provisions of subdivision two of this 4 section shall be subject to a civil penalty of up to two hundred fifty 5 dollars for a first offense and up to five hundred dollars for any 6 subsequent offense. The provisions of this section shall be enforced 7 concurrently by the director or commissioner of a municipal consumer 8 affairs office, or by the town attorney, city corporation coun- 9 sel, or other lawful designee of a municipality or local government, and 10 all moneys collected thereunder shall be retained by such municipality 11 or local government. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect six months after it shall have become 13 a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment, and/or repeal of 14 any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of this act on 15 its effective date are authorized to be made and completed on or before 16 such effective date.